Oklahoma, session 2025, SB309.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2357.701 of Title 68, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:


1. “Eligible dependent child” means a child who is less than


nineteen (19) years of age that otherwise qualifies as a dependent


for federal income tax purposes and is a natural child of both of


the taxpayers; and


2. “Taxpayer” means a legally married couple filing as married


filing separately or married filing jointly.



Req. No. 389 Page 1


B. For tax year 2025 and subsequent tax years, there shall be


allowed a credit against the tax imposed by Section 2355 of Title 68


of the Oklahoma Statutes for each eligible dependent child residing


with the taxpayers in the following amounts:


1. Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) for taxpayers continuously


married for at least one (1) but less than five (5) years;


2. One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for taxpayers continuously


married for at least five (5) years but less than ten (10) years;


3. One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00) for taxpayers


continuously married for at least ten (10) years but less than


fifteen (15) years; and


4. Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) for taxpayers continuously


married for at least fifteen (15) years.


C. Credits claimed pursuant to this section shall not exceed


Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) for taxpayers filing as married


filing jointly and Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) for each


taxpayer filing as married filing separately in any tax year.


D. For taxpayers filing as married filing separately, each


taxpayer shall be awarded credit equal to fifty percent (50%) of the


amount provided in subsection B of this section for each eligible


dependent child.


E. The credit authorized pursuant to the provisions of this


section shall not be used to reduce the income tax liability of the


taxpayer to less than zero (0).

Req. No. 389 Page 2


F. If the amount of the credit allowed pursuant to subsection B


of this section exceeds the income tax liability, the amount of


credit not used in any tax year may be carried forward, in order, to


each of the five (5) subsequent tax years.


G. Taxpayers shall claim the credit authorized pursuant to this


section on a form prescribed by the Oklahoma Tax Commission. The


form shall require certification of the number of eligible dependent


children residing in the household of the taxpayers for at least


half of the corresponding tax year, the names of the taxpayers, date


of marriage, a copy of the marriage license issued under strict


compliance with the provisions of Section 3 of Title 43 of the


Oklahoma Statutes, and a signed attestation, under penalty of


perjury, that the marriage is continuous from the date of marriage


through the corresponding tax year.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-389 QD 12/30/2024 11:59:17 PM















Req. No. 389 Page 3